Wisconsin, session 2025, SB652.
do enact as follows:SB652,1Section 1. 36.05 (6r) of the statutes is created to read:36.05 (6r) (a) Subject to par. (b), “disadvantaged,” with respect to a student, means having demonstrated social and economic disadvantage affirmatively based on the student’s own experiences and circumstances within American society and without regard to race or sex.(b) To satisfy the requirement to be a disadvantaged student and ensure all determinations of disadvantage are not based in whole or in part on race or sex, a student shall do all of the following:1. Provide a personal narrative that establishes the existence of disadvantage by a preponderance of the evidence based on individualized proof regarding specific instances of economic hardship, systemic barriers, and denied opportunities that impeded the student’s progress or success in education. The personal narrative must state how and to what extent the impediments caused the student economic harm, including a full description of type and magnitude, and must establish the student is economically disadvantaged in fact relative to similarly situated non-disadvantaged individuals.2. Attach to the personal narrative under subd. 1. a current personal net worth statement and any other financial information the student considers relevant.SB652,2Section 2. 36.25 (14) of the statutes is amended to read:36.25 (14) Graduate student financial aid. The board shall establish a grant program for minority and disadvantaged graduate students enrolled in the system. The board shall give preference in awarding grants under this subsection to residents of this state. The board may not make a grant under this subsection to a person whose name appears on the statewide support lien docket under s. 49.854 (2) (b), unless the person provides to the board a payment agreement that has been approved by the county child support agency under s. 59.53 (5) and that is consistent with rules promulgated under s. 49.858 (2) (a).SB652,3Section 3. 36.25 (14m) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:36.25 (14m) (title) Minority and disadvantaged Disadvantaged student programs.SB652,4Section 4. 36.25 (14m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:36.25 (14m) (a) The board shall fund programs for recruiting minority and disadvantaged students and for minority and disadvantaged students enrolled in the system.SB652,5Section 5. 36.25 (14m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:36.25 (14m) (b) By April 15, 1992, and annually thereafter, the board shall adopt a precollege, recruitment and retention plan for minority and disadvantaged students enrolled in the system.SB652,6Section 6. 36.25 (14m) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:36.25 (14m) (c) 2. All financial aid distributed to students, categorized by ethnic group, class level and dependency status. The report shall include information on financial need, percentage of need satisfied by loan, percentage of need satisfied by grant, and the percentage remaining unsatisfied.SB652,7Section 7. 36.34 (title) and (1) (title) and (a) of the statutes are repealed.SB652,8Section 8. 36.34 (1) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 36.34 and amended to read:36.34 Ben R. Lawton grant program. The board shall establish a grant program for minority undergraduates disadvantaged undergraduate students enrolled in the system. The board shall designate all grants under this subsection section as Lawton grants. The board may not make a grant under this subsection section to a person whose name appears on the statewide support lien docket under s. 49.854 (2) (b), unless the person provides to the board a payment agreement that has been approved by the county child support agency under s. 59.53 (5) and that is consistent with rules promulgated under s. 49.858 (2) (a).SB652,9Section 9. 38.01 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:38.01 (4m) “Disadvantaged,” with respect to a student, has the meaning given in s. 36.05 (6r).SB652,10Section 10. 38.04 (8) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:38.04 (8) (title) Minority Disadvantaged student participation and retention plan.SB652,11Section 11. 38.04 (8) (a) of the statutes is repealed.SB652,12Section 12. 38.04 (8) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 38.04 (8) and amended to read:38.04 (8) Annually by January 1, the board shall develop a plan to increase minority group member participation and retention in the technical college system of disadvantaged students. The plan shall specify each district board’s goals and objectives for minority group member participation and retention of disadvantaged students. The plan shall outline activities and programs that enhance minority group member participation and retention of disadvantaged students and shall review the progress made by the board and by district boards in the previous school year.SB652,13Section 13. 38.26 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:38.26 (title) Minority Disadvantaged student participation and retention grants.SB652,14Section 14. 38.26 (1) of the statutes is repealed.SB652,15Section 15. 38.26 (2) (a), (b), (c), (d) and (e) of the statutes are amended to read:38.26 (2) (a) The creation or expansion of programs that provide counseling and tutoring services for minority disadvantaged students.(b) Programs that demonstrate innovative approaches to increasing minority disadvantaged student placement and retention in technical education programs that have a high earning potential for their graduates.(c) Providing internships to minority disadvantaged students enrolled in programs that prepare their graduates for admission to a teacher education program at an institution within the University of Wisconsin System.(d) Programs that combine basic skills and occupational training as a means of expediting basic skills remediation and increasing retention of minority disadvantaged students.(e) Programs that use community-based organizations to assist in the recruitment, training and retention of minority disadvantaged students.SB652,16Section 16. 38.27 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:38.27 (1) (a) The creation or expansion of adult high school, adult basic education, and English as a 2nd language courses. The board shall give priority to courses serving students with disabilities or minority, unemployed, or disadvantaged students.SB652,17Section 17. 39.15 (1) (c) of the statutes is repealed.SB652,18Section 18. 39.26 of the statutes is renumbered 39.26 (intro.) and amended to read:39.26 Definition Definitions. (intro.) In this subchapter, “board”:(1) “Board” means the higher educational aids board.SB652,19Section 19. 39.26 (2) of the statutes is created to read:39.26 (2) “Disadvantaged,” with respect to a student, has the meaning given in s. 36.05 (6r).SB652,20Section 20. 39.40 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:39.40 (title) Minority teacher Teacher loan program for disadvantaged students.SB652,21Section 21. 39.40 (1) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:39.40 (1) In this section, “economically disadvantaged pupil” has the meaning given in s. 115.43 (1).SB652,22Section 22. 39.40 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:39.40 (2) (intro.) The board shall establish a loan program for minority disadvantaged students who meet all of the following requirements:SB652,23Section 23. 39.40 (3) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:39.40 (3) (b) 1. The recipient is employed as provided in subd. 1m. by a public or private elementary or secondary school, or by a tribal school, as defined in s. 115.001 (15m), located in a school district in this state in which minority students economically disadvantaged pupils constitute at least 40 60 percent of the membership, as defined in s. 121.004 (5).SB652,24Section 24. 39.44 (title) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:39.44 (title) Grants for disadvantaged undergraduate students.SB652,25Section 25. 39.44 (1) (a) of the statutes is repealed.SB652,26Section 26. 39.44 (1) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 39.44 (1) and amended to read:39.44 (1) There is established, to be administered by the board, the minority undergraduate retention a grant program for minority undergraduates the retention of disadvantaged undergraduate students enrolled in private, nonprofit higher educational institutions in this state or in technical colleges in this state. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb652 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb652 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB652 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB652 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB652: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting